District of Columbia statutes.
42-1018

Power to be executed by devise, will, or grant, as directed.

Where a power to dispose of lands is confined to a disposition by devise or will, the instrument of execution must be a will duly executed; and where a power is confined to a disposition by grant it cannot be executed by will, although the disposition is not intended to take effect until after the death of the party executing the power.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1354, ch. 854, § 1054

History

Wills, see §§ 18-108, 18-303.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 45-118.
1973 Ed., § 45-1018.

Prior Codifications